New York, session 2025-2026, A5423.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 2 159-e to read as follows: 3 § 159-e. Four-day workweek pilot program. 1. On or before October 4 first, two thousand twenty-seven, the division of the budget, in cooper- 5 ation with the department, shall identify state agencies or other jobs 6 in the performance of any function of state government for which a four- 7 day workweek is feasible and beneficial for at least sixty percent of 8 state employees employed by such state agency or employed in the 9 performance of such function of state government. 10 2. The division of the budget and the department shall: 11 (a) subject to paragraph (b) of this subdivision, on or before October 12 first, two thousand twenty-nine, complete the implementation of a four- 13 day workweek for state employees employed in the state agencies or in 14 the jobs in the performance of a function of state government identified 15 pursuant to subdivision one of this section; and 16 (b) if such state employees for whom a four-day workweek will be 17 implemented under paragraph (a) of this subdivision are in a bargaining 18 unit represented by an exclusive representative, before implementation: 19 (i) negotiate the transition of such employees in such bargaining unit 20 to a four-day workweek; and 21 (ii) complete a signed agreement with such exclusive representative 22 that establishes the requirements of such four-day workweek for such 23 employees in such bargaining unit. 24 3. An employee who transitions to a four-day workweek pursuant to this 25 section may not, as a direct result of such transition: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07376-01-5 A. 5423 2 1 (a) have work hours reduced to less than thirty-six hours of work each 2 week; or 3 (b) receive a reduction in pay or benefits. 4 4. On or before October first, two thousand thirty, the division of 5 the budget and the department shall submit a report to the governor and 6 the legislature on the implementation of a four-day workweek pursuant to 7 this section, which shall include: 8 (a) the status of such implementation; 9 (b) the impact of such implementation on: 10 (i) vacancy rates; and 11 (ii) the budgets of the affected state agencies; and 12 (c) any other relevant information as determined by the division of 13 the budget and the department. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.